tests/wad.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for wad

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>
%<adj%>
%<ess%>
%<dem%>
%<det%>
%<imp%>
%<ij%>
%<itg%>
%<loc%>
%<v%>
%<num%>
%<prt%>
%<pr%>
%<prn%>
%<np%>
%<adj%>
%<adp%>
%<adv%>
%<comp%>
%<cnj%>
%<det%>
%<def%>
%<prx%>
%<mid%>
%<dist%>
%<prt%>
%<top%>
%<dir%>
%<asp%>
%<ints%>
%<neg%>
%<dur%>
%<cnj%>
%<appl%>
%<caus%>

! Number morphology
%<pl%>
%<sg%>

! Other symbols
%>
%{b%}
%{B%}
%{D%}
%{A%}

%[%+1incdu%] %[%+1incpl%] %[%+1sg%] %[%+1excdu%] %[%+1excpl%] %[%+2sg%] %[%+2du%] %[%+2pl%] %[%+3sg%] %[%+3du%] %[%+3plhum%] %[%+3plnh%]

%[%-1incdu%] %[%-1incpl%] %[%-1sg%] %[%-1excdu%] %[%-1excpl%] %[%-2sg%] %[%-2du%] %[%-2pl%] %[%-3sg%] %[%-3du%] %[%-3plhum%] %[%-3plnh%]

%[%+appl%] %[%-appl%]
%[%+caus%] %[%-caus%]

LEXICON Root

VerbPrefix ;

LEXICON VerbPrefix

%[%+1incdu%]:tur VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1incpl%]:tat VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1sg%]:i VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1excdu%]:amur VerbApplicative ;
%[%+1excpl%]:amat VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2sg%]:%{B%}u VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2du%]:mur VerbApplicative ;
%[%+2pl%]:met VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3sg%]:%{D%}i VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3du%]:sur VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3plhum%]:set VerbApplicative ;
%[%+3plnh%]:si VerbApplicative ;

LEXICON VerbApplicative

%[%+appl%]:it VerbCausative ;
VerbCausative ;

LEXICON VerbCausative

%[%+caus%]:on VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON VerbInfl

%<v%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<incl%>%[%-1incdu%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<incl%>%[%-1incpl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%-1sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<du%>%<excl%>%[%-1excdu%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%[%-1excpl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%[%-2sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<du%>%[%-2du%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%[%-2pl%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%[%-3sg%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<du%>%[%-3du%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<hum%>%[%-3plhum%]: VerbInflAppl ;
%<v%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nh%>%[%-3plnh%]: VerbInflAppl ;

LEXICON VerbInflAppl

%<appl%>%[%-appl%]: VerbInflCaus ;
VerbInflCaus ;

LEXICON VerbInflCaus

%<caus%>%[%-caus%]: # ;
# ;

LEXICON VerbRoot

a:a VerbInfl ;
adiat:%{A%}diat VerbInfl ;
adiava:%{A%}diava VerbInfl ;
adu:%{A%}du VerbInfl ;
amise:%{A%}mise VerbInfl ;
ana:%{A%}na VerbInfl ;
ananar:%{A%}nanar VerbInfl ;
ane:%{A%}ne VerbInfl ;
ania:%{A%}nia VerbInfl ;
aniau:%{A%}niau VerbInfl ;
aniwar:%{A%}niwar VerbInfl ;
anota:%{A%}nota VerbInfl ;
anu:%{A%}nu VerbInfl ;
apai:%{A%}pai VerbInfl ;
ape:%{A%}pe VerbInfl ;
api:%{A%}pi VerbInfl ;
ara:%{A%}ra VerbInfl ;
ariarir:%{A%}riarir VerbInfl ;
aririarir:%{A%}ririarir VerbInfl ;
as:%{A%}s VerbInfl ;
asiei:%{A%}siei VerbInfl ;
asiwar:%{A%}siwar VerbInfl ;
atore:%{A%}tore VerbInfl ;
avakir:%{A%}vakir VerbInfl ;
avi:%{A%}vi VerbInfl ;
avute:%{A%}vute VerbInfl ;
aware:%{A%}ware VerbInfl ;
awawai:%{A%}wawai VerbInfl ;
awer:%{A%}wer VerbInfl ;
awia:%{A%}wia VerbInfl ;
bai:b%{A%}i VerbInfl ;
bajor:b%{A%}jor VerbInfl ;
deriasi:deriasi VerbInfl ;
ena:ena VerbInfl ;
iravesie:iravesie VerbInfl ;
iri:iri VerbInfl ;
isa:isa VerbInfl ;
isani:isani VerbInfl ;
isi:isi VerbInfl ;
ka:k%{A%} VerbInfl ;
kadadiri:k%{A%}dadiri VerbInfl ;
kais:k%{A%}is VerbInfl ;
kamadiwa:k%{A%}madiwa VerbInfl ;
kamanam:k%{A%}manam VerbInfl ;
kamaru:k%{A%}maru VerbInfl ;
kambarai:k%{A%}mbarai VerbInfl ;
kanisu:k%{A%}nisu VerbInfl ;
kapori:k%{A%}pori VerbInfl ;
karamut:k%{A%}ramut VerbInfl ;
karier:k%{A%}rier VerbInfl ;
karieri:k%{A%}rieri VerbInfl ;
karipe:k%{A%}ripe VerbInfl ;
kariria:k%{A%}riria VerbInfl ;
karotui:k%{A%}rotui VerbInfl ;
karutarera:k%{A%}rutarera VerbInfl ;
kase:k%{A%}se VerbInfl ;
kasie:k%{A%}sie VerbInfl ;
kasiou:k%{A%}siou VerbInfl ;
kavera:k%{A%}vera VerbInfl ;
kavio:k%{A%}vio VerbInfl ;
kaye:k%{A%}ye VerbInfl ;
kerat:kerat VerbInfl ;
keri:keri VerbInfl ;
kivari:kivari VerbInfl ;
kopa:kopa VerbInfl ;
kotar:kotar VerbInfl ;
kubira:kubira VerbInfl ;
kutu:kutu VerbInfl ;
mamaya:m%{A%}maya VerbInfl ;
mamu:m%{A%}mu VerbInfl ;
manau:m%{A%}nau VerbInfl ;
manggar:m%{A%}ŋgar VerbInfl ;
marandi:m%{A%}randi VerbInfl ;
marariat:m%{A%}rariat VerbInfl ;
mararieti:m%{A%}rarieti VerbInfl ;
marera:m%{A%}rera VerbInfl ;
marera:m%{A%}rera VerbInfl ;
mari:m%{A%}ri VerbInfl ;
marior:m%{A%}rior VerbInfl ;
marova:m%{A%}rova VerbInfl ;
maroya:m%{A%}roya VerbInfl ;
marura:m%{A%}rura VerbInfl ;
marutu:m%{A%}rutu VerbInfl ;
masa:m%{A%}sa VerbInfl ;
masivaveri:m%{A%}sivaveri VerbInfl ;
maso:m%{A%}so VerbInfl ;
masop:m%{A%}sop VerbInfl ;
masubat:m%{A%}subat VerbInfl ;
matai:m%{A%}tai VerbInfl ;
matitiotap:m%{A%}titiotap VerbInfl ;
maye:m%{A%}ye VerbInfl ;
mayo:m%{A%}yo VerbInfl ;
meire:meire VerbInfl ;
mesari:mesari VerbInfl ;
mosi:mosi VerbInfl ;
mun:mun VerbInfl ;
musane:musane VerbInfl ;
nai:n%{A%}i VerbInfl ;
nanari:n%{A%}nari VerbInfl ;
nanaripi:n%{A%}naripi VerbInfl ;
naya:n%{A%}ya VerbInfl ;
nei:nei VerbInfl ;
newe:newe VerbInfl ;
newi:newi VerbInfl ;
nganggat:ŋ%{A%}ŋgat VerbInfl ;
nomu:nomu VerbInfl ;
nunu:nunu VerbInfl ;
o:o VerbInfl ;
one:one VerbInfl ;
osa:osa VerbInfl ;
otabia:otabia VerbInfl ;
otara:otara VerbInfl ;
otara:otara VerbInfl ;
otu:otu VerbInfl ;
oyo:oyo VerbInfl ;
pape:p%{A%}pe VerbInfl ;
papo:p%{A%}po VerbInfl ;
pera:pera VerbInfl ;
peya:peya VerbInfl ;
poriri:poriri VerbInfl ;
posasa:posasa VerbInfl ;
posasiei:posasiei VerbInfl ;
pota:pota VerbInfl ;
pote:pote VerbInfl ;
poya:poya VerbInfl ;
pu:pu VerbInfl ;
pui:pui VerbInfl ;
ra:r%{A%} VerbInfl ;
rama:r%{A%}ma VerbInfl ;
rariorar:r%{A%}riorar VerbInfl ;
rau:r%{A%}u VerbInfl ;
rekamani:rekamani VerbInfl ;
repe:repe VerbInfl ;
rera:rera VerbInfl ;
resasi:resasi VerbInfl ;
rewas:rewas VerbInfl ;
ri:ri VerbInfl ;
riesa:riesa VerbInfl ;
rina:rina VerbInfl ;
rira:rira VerbInfl ;
ririau:ririau VerbInfl ;
riwan:riwan VerbInfl ;
ro:ro VerbInfl ;
roi:roi VerbInfl ;
rora:rora VerbInfl ;
rotu:rotu VerbInfl ;
royare:royare VerbInfl ;
ruase:ruase VerbInfl ;
rubatai:rubatai VerbInfl ;
rukusare:rukusare VerbInfl ;
rure:rure VerbInfl ;
ruri:ruri VerbInfl ;
rusasa:rusasa VerbInfl ;
rut:rut VerbInfl ;
sa:s%{A%} VerbInfl ;
sa:s%{A%} VerbInfl ;
sabaya:s%{A%}baya VerbInfl ;
sairara:s%{A%}irara VerbInfl ;
samariari:s%{A%}mariari VerbInfl ;
samuai:s%{A%}muai VerbInfl ;
sanana:s%{A%}nana VerbInfl ;
sanepai:s%{A%}nepai VerbInfl ;
sanepaya:s%{A%}nepaya VerbInfl ;
sanepaya:s%{A%}nepaya VerbInfl ;
sanevesie:s%{A%}nevesie VerbInfl ;
sarai:s%{A%}rai VerbInfl ;
sario:s%{A%}rio VerbInfl ;
sasara:s%{A%}sara VerbInfl ;
sase:s%{A%}se VerbInfl ;
sasera:s%{A%}sera VerbInfl ;
sasi:s%{A%}si VerbInfl ;
sasie:s%{A%}sie VerbInfl ;
sasiri:s%{A%}siri VerbInfl ;
saviori:s%{A%}viori VerbInfl ;
sayor:s%{A%}yor VerbInfl ;
se:se VerbInfl ;
sera:sera VerbInfl ;
sesa:sesa VerbInfl ;
setawa:setawa VerbInfl ;
seva:seva VerbInfl ;
siar:siar VerbInfl ;
simarai:simarai VerbInfl ;
siorap:siorap VerbInfl ;
siwara:siwara VerbInfl ;
so:so VerbInfl ;
so:so VerbInfl ;
sobata:sobata VerbInfl ;
soive:soive VerbInfl ;
sokiare:sokiare VerbInfl ;
sokiase:sokiase VerbInfl ;
som:som VerbInfl ;
sonini:sonini VerbInfl ;
sora:sora VerbInfl ;
sori:sori VerbInfl ;
sosa:sosa VerbInfl ;
sosoya:sosoya VerbInfl ;
sovera:sovera VerbInfl ;
su:su VerbInfl ;
suetawana:suetawana VerbInfl ;
sum:sum VerbInfl ;
sume:sume VerbInfl ;
suvi:suvi VerbInfl ;
suvuan:suvuan VerbInfl ;
suwasi:suwasi VerbInfl ;
ta:t%{A%} VerbInfl ;
taisu:t%{A%}isu VerbInfl ;
tandor:t%{A%}ndor VerbInfl ;
tapu:t%{A%}pu VerbInfl ;
tara:t%{A%}ra VerbInfl ;
tare:t%{A%}re VerbInfl ;
tarisu:t%{A%}risu VerbInfl ;
tata:t%{A%}ta VerbInfl ;
tatare:t%{A%}tare VerbInfl ;
tatira:t%{A%}tira VerbInfl ;
tatopa:t%{A%}topa VerbInfl ;
tavavu:t%{A%}vavu VerbInfl ;
tavera:t%{A%}vera VerbInfl ;
tavi:t%{A%}vi VerbInfl ;
taviar:t%{A%}viar VerbInfl ;
tawa:t%{A%}wa VerbInfl ;
tenam:tenam VerbInfl ;
tera:tera VerbInfl ;
tere:tere VerbInfl ;
tipira:tipira VerbInfl ;
tire:tire VerbInfl ;
tisa:tisa VerbInfl ;
tita:tita VerbInfl ;
titiai:titiai VerbInfl ;
tob:tob VerbInfl ;
topa:topa VerbInfl ;
tota:tota VerbInfl ;
tupar:tupar VerbInfl ;
turu:turu VerbInfl ;
tut:tut VerbInfl ;
tuwa:tuwa VerbInfl ;
ubira:ubira VerbInfl ;
unusar:unusar VerbInfl ;
ur:ur VerbInfl ;
urusara:urusara VerbInfl ;
usar:usar VerbInfl ;
uta:uta VerbInfl ;
utanusara:utanusara VerbInfl ;
uvietu:uvietu VerbInfl ;
vabara:v%{A%}bara VerbInfl ;
varakare:v%{A%}rakare VerbInfl ;
varo:v%{A%}ro VerbInfl ;
vata:v%{A%}ta VerbInfl ;
vaune:v%{A%}une VerbInfl ;
vavou:v%{A%}vou VerbInfl ;
vawatatar:v%{A%}watatar VerbInfl ;
ve:ve VerbInfl ;
vediadi:vediadi VerbInfl ;
vedior:vedior VerbInfl ;
vekapo:vekapo VerbInfl ;
venadi:venadi VerbInfl ;
veprenta:veprenta VerbInfl ;
vereri:vereri VerbInfl ;
vesikop:vesikop VerbInfl ;
vesusa:vesusa VerbInfl ;
via:via VerbInfl ;
viviare:viviare VerbInfl ;
vo:vo VerbInfl ;
vori:vori VerbInfl ;
voru:voru VerbInfl ;
vove:vove VerbInfl ;
vui:vui VerbInfl ;
vuvu:vuvu VerbInfl ;
